Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 6
SELLERS OF MANUFACTURED HOMES - REGISTRATION,
ESCROW AND BONDING,
AND CONTRACT REQUIREMENTS

6-1-601 to 6-1-606. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part repealed, p. 532, § 1, effective March 5.

Editor's note:

This part 6 was added in 1999 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2003. For the text of this part 6 prior to 2003, consult the 2002 Colorado Revised Statutes.